Washington statutes.
RCW 36.54.130

County ferry districts—Tax levy authorized—Uses.

(1) To carry out the purposes for which ferry districts are created, the governing body of a ferry district may levy each year an ad valorem tax on all taxable property located in the district not to exceed seventy-five cents per thousand dollars of assessed value, except a ferry district in a county with a population of one million five hundred thousand or more may not levy at a rate that exceeds seven and one-half cents per thousand dollars of assessed value. The levy must be sufficient for the provision of ferry services as shown to be required by the budget prepared by the governing body of the ferry district.

(2) A tax imposed under this section may be used only for:

(a) Providing ferry services, including the purchase, lease, or rental of ferry vessels and dock facilities;

(b) The operation, maintenance, and improvement of ferry vessels and dock facilities;

(c) Providing shuttle services between the ferry terminal and passenger parking facilities, and other landside improvements directly related to the provision of passenger-only ferry service; and

(d) Related personnel costs.

[ 2009 c 551 s 4; 2007 c 223 s 6; 2006 c 332 s 9; 2003 c 83 s 303.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2007 c 223: See note following RCW 36.57A.220.

Findings—Intent—Captions, part headings not law—Severability—Effective date—2003 c 83: See notes following RCW 36.57A.200.